Mississippi, session 2026, HB1702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "City of Jackson Revitalization Act". SECTION 2.  Section 75-76-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-5. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: (a) "Applicant" means any person who has applied for or is about to apply for a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter. (b) "Application" means a request for the issuance of a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or for approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter but does not include any supplemental forms or information that may be required with the application. (c) "Associated equipment" means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or with any game, race book or sports pool that would not otherwise be classified as a gaming device, including dice, playing cards, links which connect to progressive slot machines, equipment which affects the proper reporting of gross revenue, computerized systems of betting at a race book or sports pool, computerized systems for monitoring slot machines, and devices for weighing or counting money. (d) "Chairman" means the Chairman of the Mississippi Gaming Commission except when used in the term "Chairman of the State Tax Commission." "Chairman of the State Tax Commission" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue. (e) "Commission" or "Mississippi Gaming Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (f) "Commission member" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (g) "Credit instrument" means a writing which evidences a gaming debt owed to a person who holds a license at the time the debt is created, and includes any writing taken in consolidation, redemption or payment of a prior credit instrument. (h) "Enforcement division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides enforcement functions. (i) "Establishment" means any premises wherein or whereon any gaming is done. (j) "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (k) Except as otherwise provided by law, "game," or "gambling game" means any banking or percentage game played with cards, with dice or with any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic device or machine for money, property, checks, credit or any representative of value, including, without limiting, the generality of the foregoing, faro, monte, roulette, keno, fan-tan, twenty-one, blackjack, seven-and-a-half, big injun, klondike, craps, poker, chuck-a-luck (dai shu), wheel of fortune, chemin de fer, baccarat, pai gow, beat the banker, panguingui, slot machine, or any other game or device approved by the commission.  However, "game" or "gambling game" shall not include bingo games or raffles which are held pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-33-51, or the illegal gambling activities described in Section 97-33-8. The commission shall not be required to recognize any game hereunder with respect to which the commission determines it does not have sufficient experience or expertise. (l) "Gaming" or "gambling" means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play any game as defined in this chapter. (m) "Gaming device" means any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with gaming or any game which affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss.  The term includes a system for processing information which can alter the normal criteria of random selection, which affects the operation of any game, or which determines the outcome of a game.  The term does not include a system or device which affects a game solely by stopping its operation so that the outcome remains undetermined, and does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (n) "Gaming employee" means any person connected directly with the operation of a gaming establishment licensed to conduct any game, including: (i) Boxmen; (ii) Cashiers; (iii) Change personnel; (iv) Counting room personnel; (v) Dealers; (vi) Floormen; (vii) Hosts or other persons empowered to extend credit or complimentary services; (viii) Keno runners; (ix) Keno writers; (x) Machine mechanics; (xi) Security personnel; (xii) Shift or pit bosses; (xiii) Shills; (xiv) Supervisors or managers; and (xv) Ticket writers. The term "gaming employee" also includes employees of manufacturers or distributors of gaming equipment within this state whose duties are directly involved with the manufacture, repair or distribution of gaming equipment. "Gaming employee" does not include bartenders, cocktail waitresses or other persons engaged in preparing or serving food or beverages unless acting in some other capacity. (o) "Gaming license" means any license issued by the state which authorizes the person named therein to engage in gaming. (p) "Gross revenue" means the total of all of the following, less the total of all cash paid out as losses to patrons and those amounts paid to purchase annuities to fund losses paid to patrons over several years by independent financial institutions: (i) Cash received as winnings; (ii) Cash received in payment for credit extended by a licensee to a patron for purposes of gaming; and (iii) Compensation received for conducting any game in which the licensee is not party to a wager. For the purposes of this definition, cash or the value of noncash prizes awarded to patrons in a contest or tournament are not losses. The term does not include: (i) Counterfeit money or tokens; (ii) Coins of other countries which are received in gaming devices; (iii) Cash taken in fraudulent acts perpetrated against a licensee for which the licensee is not reimbursed; or (iv) Cash received as entry fees for contests or tournaments in which the patrons compete for prizes. (q) "Hearing examiner" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission or other person authorized by the commission to conduct hearings. (r) "Investigation division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides investigative functions. (s) "License" means a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (t) "Licensee" means any person to whom a valid license has been issued. (u) "License fees" means monies required by law to be paid to obtain or continue a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (v) "Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter wherein or whereon gaming is done. (w) "Manufacturer's," "seller's" or "distributor's" license means a license issued pursuant to Section 75-76-79. (x) "Navigable waters" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 27-109-1. (y) "Operation" means the conduct of gaming. (z) "Party" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding before the commission; or the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding for judicial review of any action, decision or order of the commission. (aa) "Person" includes any association, corporation, firm, partnership, trust or other form of business association as well as a natural person. (bb) "Premises" means land, together with all buildings, improvements and personal property located thereon, and includes all parts of any vessel or cruise vessel. (cc) "Race book" means the business of accepting wagers upon the outcome of any event held at a track which uses the pari-mutuel system of wagering. (dd) "Regulation" means a rule, standard, directive or statement of general applicability which effectuates law or policy or which describes the procedure or requirements for practicing before the commission.  The term includes a proposed regulation and the amendment or repeal of a prior regulation but does not include: (i) A statement concerning only the internal management of the commission and not affecting the rights or procedures available to any licensee or other person; (ii) A declaratory ruling; (iii) An interagency memorandum; (iv) The commission's decision in a contested case or relating to an application for a license; or (v) Any notice concerning the fees to be charged which are necessary for the administration of this chapter. (ee) "Respondent" means any licensee or other person against whom a complaint has been filed with the commission. (ff) "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical or other device, contrivance or machine which, upon insertion of a coin, token or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, whether by reason of the skill of the operator or application of the element of chance, or both, may deliver or entitle the person playing or operating the machine to receive cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens or anything of value, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner.  The term does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (gg) "Sports pool" means the business of accepting wagers on collegiate or professional sporting events or athletic events, by any system or method of wagering other than the system known as the "pari-mutuel method of wagering." (hh) "State Tax Commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi. (ii) "Temporary work permit" means a work permit which is valid only for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days from its date of issue and which is not renewable. (jj) "Vessel" or "cruise vessel" shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms under Section 27-109-1. (kk) "Work permit" means any card, certificate or permit issued by the commission, whether denominated as a work permit, registration card or otherwise, authorizing the employment of the holder as a gaming employee.  A document issued by any governmental authority for any employment other than gaming is not a valid work permit for the purposes of this chapter. (ll) "School or training institution" means any school or training institution which is licensed by the commission to teach or train gaming employees pursuant to Section 75-76-34. (mm) "Cheat" means to alter the selection of criteria that determine: (i) The rules of a game; or (ii) The amount or frequency of payment in a game. (nn) "Promotional activity" means an activity or event conducted or held for the purpose of promoting or marketing the individual licensed gaming establishment that is engaging in the promotional activity.  The term includes, but is not limited to, a game of any kind other than as defined in paragraph (k) of this section, a tournament, a contest, a drawing, or a promotion of any kind. (oo) "Project" means a major capital project that: (i) Will be located near the downtown area of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, inside the Capitol Complex Improvement District created in Section 29-5-203, and within six thousand (6,000) feet of the grounds of the New Capitol; (ii) Will consist of one (1) licensed gaming establishment as well as other developments as part of the project; (iii) Will have a minimum capital investment of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00); and (iv) Is owned or will be owned, in any form or manner, by: 1.  One (1) or more persons owning or operating a licensed gaming establishment or licensed gaming establishment or licensed gaming establishments at the time of submitting an application under this chapter for a license for a licensed gaming establishment that will be part of the project, and/or 2. One (1) or more persons having owned or operated a licensed gaming establishment or licensed gaming establishments before July 1, 2026, regardless of whether such person or persons own or operate a licensed gaming establishment or licensed gaming establishments at the time of submitting an application under this chapter for a license for a licensed gaming establishment that will be part of the project. SECTION 3.  Section 75-76-129, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Through June 30, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 75-76-129. (1)  On or before the last day of each month all taxes, fees, interest, penalties, damages, fines or other monies collected by the Department of Revenue during that month under the provisions of this chapter, with the exception of (a) the local government fees imposed under Section 75-76-195, and (b) an amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c), and (c) the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) as a result of wagers on sporting events, and (d) the revenue collected pursuant to the fees imposed under Section 75-76-183(3), shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State General Fund.  The local government fees shall be distributed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 75-76-197. (2) An amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected during that month pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue into the bond sinking fund created in Section 1(3) of Chapter 479, Laws of 2015. (3) Revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) as a result of wagers on sporting events shall be deposited into the State Highway Fund to be used solely for the repair and maintenance of highways and bridges of the State of Mississippi.  This revenue shall be used first for matching funds made available to the state for such purposes pursuant to any federal highway infrastructure program implemented after September 1, 2018. (4) Revenue collected pursuant to the fees imposed under Section 75-76-183(3) shall be deposited into the City of Jackson Development Fund created in Section 5 of this act. [From and after July 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 75-76-129. On or before the last day of each month all taxes, fees, interest, penalties, damages, fines or other monies collected by the Department of Revenue during that month under the provisions of this chapter, with the exception of (a) the local government fees imposed under Section 75-76-195, and (b) an amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c), and (c) the revenue collected pursuant to the fees imposed under Section 75-76-183(3), shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State General Fund.  The local government fees shall be distributed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 75-76-197.  An amount equal to Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of the revenue collected during that month pursuant to the fee imposed under Section 75-76-177(1)(c) shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue into the bond sinking fund created in Section 1(3) of Chapter 479, Laws of 2015.  Revenue collected pursuant to the fees imposed under Section 75-76-183(3), shall be deposited into the City of Jackson Development Fund created in Section 5 of this act. SECTION 4.  Section 75-76-183, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-183.  (1)  Each applicant for a license to conduct gaming aboard a vessel or cruise vessel shall pay an application fee of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (2)  Each licensee who is licensed to conduct gaming aboard a vessel or cruise vessel shall pay an annual license fee of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (3) (i)  In addition to any other fees provided for in this chapter, an applicant who is approved for a license to conduct gaming as a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project shall pay a development fee of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) after initial issuance of the license to the applicant. (ii) In addition to any other fees provided for in this chapter, a licensee who is licensed to conduct gaming as a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project shall pay an annual development fee of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) for each of the ten (10) years immediately succeeding the year in which the licensee was so initially licensed. SECTION 5.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings as defined in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Department of Finance and Administration. (b) "Development" means the acquisition, construction, renovation, repairs, upgrades and improvements to property such as buildings and other facilities and/or infrastructure for the establishment of new business enterprises and/or the expansion of existing business enterprises, and/or procuring the acquisition, construction, renovation, repairs, upgrades and improvements to property such as buildings and other facilities and/or infrastructure for the establishment of new business enterprises and/or the expansion of existing business enterprises. (c) "Person" means any association, corporation, firm, partnership, trust or other form of business association as well as a natural person. (2) (a)  The department shall establish a grant and revolving loan program to provide grants and loans to assist persons in paying costs associated with development in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (b) A person desiring assistance under the program established under this section must submit an application to the department.  The application must contain: (i) A description of: 1. The property to be developed, 2. The purpose or purposes for which the property is or was formerly being used at the time the application is submitted, 3. The type of work the applicant will perform as part of the development and the purpose or purposes for which the property will be used after development, 4. The amount of capital investment for the development other than assistance under this section, if any, and 5. The amount of assistance in grant and/or loan funds requested; and (ii) Any other information requested by the department. (c) The department shall review such application and determine whether the applicant is eligible for assistance under the program.  If the department approves the applicant for assistance under the program, it shall provide a certificate to the applicant designating the applicant as eligible for assistance.  Such assistance may be in the form of grant and/or loans funds. (d) Monies repaid to the state from loans authorized under this section shall be deposited into the City of Jackson Development Fund created in subsection (3) of this section. (3) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund, to be designated as the "City of Jackson Development Fund", which shall consist of monies deposited therein under Section 75-76-129, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any other monies designated for deposit therein.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to provide loans and grants for purposes described in this section. (4)  The department shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, as necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 6.  (1)  For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, if the total amount of revenue distributed to the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, for each such fiscal year under Section 75-76-197 and Chapter 965, Local and Private Laws of 1993, is less than the average total amount of such revenue distributed annually to the city for the three (3) state fiscal years immediately preceding the full state fiscal year during which the licensed gaming establishment began operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, then the Department of Finance and Administration shall disburse funds to the City of Vicksburg for the amount of such revenue shortfall for each such fiscal year.  Such funds shall be paid from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project. (2)  For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, if the total amount of revenue distributed to Warren County, Mississippi, for each such fiscal year under Section 75-76-197 and Chapter 965, Local and Private Laws of 1993, is less than the average total amount of such revenue distributed annually to the county for the three (3) state fiscal years immediately preceding the full state fiscal year during which the licensed gaming establishment began operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, then the Department of Finance and Administration shall disburse funds to Warren County for the amount of such revenue shortfall for each such fiscal year.  Such funds shall be paid from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project. (3) For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on such a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project, Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00) shall be deposited during each such fiscal year into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury. Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of paying costs associated with the construction of an athletic stadium for Jackson State University to host the university's sporting events. (4) For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on such a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited during each such fiscal year into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of paying costs associated with the repair and renovation of and upgrades and improvements to the Mississippi Children's Museum in Jackson, Mississippi. (5) For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on such a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project, Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall be deposited during each such fiscal year into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the support and maintenance of the University of Mississippi Medical Center Cancer Center and Research Institute. (6) For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the two (2) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on such a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be deposited into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury.  Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of paying costs associated with extending Lakeland Drive to Interstate 220 in Jackson, Mississippi. (7) For the first full state fiscal year during which a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project is operating and remitting license fees imposed and levied under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195, and for each of the four (4) immediately succeeding state fiscal years, from monies deposited into the State General Fund under Section 76-76-129 which are derived from fees imposed under Section 75-65-177(1) on such a licensee that is a licensed gaming establishment and part of a project, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited during each such fiscal year into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury. Monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of paying costs associated with the construction of a tram system/land transportation system running from at or near Jackson - Medgar Wiley Evers International Airport to the downtown area of Jackson, Mississippi, and also linking with the University of Mississippi Medical Center. SECTION 7.  Section 75-76-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-33. (1)  The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (2) These regulations shall, without limiting the general powers herein conferred, include the following: (a) Prescribing the method and form of application which any applicant for a license or for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license must follow and complete before consideration of his application by the executive director or the commission. (b) Prescribing the information to be furnished by any applicant or licensee concerning his antecedents, habits, character, associates, criminal record, business activities and financial affairs, past or present. (c) Prescribing the information to be furnished by a licensee relating to his employees. (d) Requiring fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, and gaming employees of a licensee, or other methods of identification and the forwarding of all fingerprints taken pursuant to regulation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (e) Prescribing the manner and procedure of all hearings conducted by the commission or any hearing examiner of the commission, including special rules of evidence applicable thereto and notices thereof. (f) Requiring any applicant to pay all or any part of the fees and costs of investigation of such applicant as may be determined by the commission under paragraph (g) of this subsection (2). (g) Prescribing the amounts of investigative fees only as authorized by regulations of the commission under paragraph (f) of this subsection, and collecting those fees.  The commission shall adopt regulations setting the amounts of those fees at levels that will provide the commission with sufficient revenue, when combined with any other monies as may be deposited into the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund created in Section 75-76-325, to carry out the provisions of this chapter without any state general funds.  In calculating the amount of such fees, the commission shall: (i) Attempt to set the fees at levels that will create a balance in the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund that does not exceed, at the end of any state fiscal year, two percent (2%) of the projected amount of funds that will provide the commission with such sufficient revenue; and (ii) Demonstrate the reasonableness of the relationship between a fee and the actual costs of the investigative activity for which the fee is being prescribed. (h) Prescribing the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and issuance of licenses. (i) Prescribing under what conditions a licensee may be deemed subject to revocation or suspension of his license. (j) Requiring any applicant or licensee to waive any privilege with respect to any testimony at any hearing or meeting of the commission, except any privilege afforded by the Constitution of the United States or this state. (k) Defining and limiting the area, games and devices permitted, and the method of operation of such games and devices, for the purposes of this chapter. (l) Prescribing under what conditions the nonpayment of a gambling debt by a licensee shall be deemed grounds for revocation or suspension of his license. (m) Governing the use and approval of gambling devices and equipment. (n) Prescribing the qualifications of, and the conditions under which, attorneys, accountants and others are permitted to practice before the commission. (o) Restricting access to confidential information obtained under this chapter and ensuring that the confidentiality of such information is maintained and protected. (p) Prescribing the manner and procedure by which the executive director on behalf of the commission shall notify a county or a municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (q) Prescribing the manner and procedure for an objection to be filed with the commission and the executive director by a county or municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each licensee shall be required to comply with the regulation that no wager may be placed by, or on behalf of, any individual or entity or group, not present on a licensed vessel or cruise vessel. (4) From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (5) From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 8.  Section 75-76-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-67. (1)  Any person who the commission determines is qualified to receive a license or be found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state gaming license or found suitable.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2) An application to receive a license or be found suitable shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a) A person of good character, honesty and integrity; (b) A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of gaming, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c) In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistent with the declared laws of the state. (3) No person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a felony in any court of this state, another state, or the United States; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable hereunder who has been convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a misdemeanor in any court of this state or of another state, when such conviction was for gambling, sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, prostitution, or procuring or inducing individuals to engage in prostitution. (4) A license to operate a gaming establishment shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a) He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in gaming or generally; and (b) The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i) Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii) From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. (5) An application to receive a license or be found suitable constitutes a request for a determination of the applicant's general character, integrity and ability to participate or engage in, or be associated with gaming.  Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official proceeding of the commission or the executive director or any witness testifying under oath which is relevant to the purpose of the proceeding is absolutely privileged and does not impose liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action. (6) The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a corporation which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (7) The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a limited partnership which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (8) No limited partnership, except one whose sole limited partner is a publicly traded corporation which has registered with the commission, or business trust or organization or other association of a quasi-corporate character is eligible to receive or hold any license under this chapter unless all persons having any direct or indirect interest therein of any nature whatsoever, whether financial, administrative, policymaking or supervisory, are individually qualified to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (9) The commission may, by regulation, limit the number of persons who may be financially interested and the nature of their interest in any corporation or other organization or association licensed under this chapter, and may establish such other qualifications of licenses as the commission, in its discretion, deems to be in the public interest and consistent with the declared policy of the state. SECTION 9.  Section 75-76-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-77. (1)  The executive director shall present his recommendation upon an application to the commission at the next meeting of the commission. (2)  The commission may, after considering the recommendation of the executive director, issue to the applicant named, as a natural person, and to the licensed gaming establishment, as a business entity, under the name or style therein designated, a state gaming license, or may deny the same. The commission may limit the license or place such conditions thereon as it may deem necessary in the public interest. The commission may, if it considers necessary, issue a probationary license. No state gaming license may be assigned either in whole or in part. (3)  After the issuance of the license, it shall continue in effect upon proper payment of the state license fees and any other fees, taxes and penalties, as required by law and the regulations of the commission, subject to the power of the commission to revoke, suspend, condition or limit licenses. (4)  The commission may further limit or place such conditions as it may deem necessary in the public interest upon any registration, finding of suitability or approval for which application has been made. (5)  After the executive director has made a recommendation for denial of an application, the commission, after considering the recommendation of the executive director, may: (a)  Deny the application; (b)  Remand the matter to the executive director for such further investigation and reconsideration as the commission may order; or (c)  By unanimous vote of the members present, grant the application for a license, registration, finding of suitability or approval. (6)  If the commission is not satisfied that an applicant recommended by the executive director is qualified to be licensed under this chapter, the commission may cause to be made such investigation into and conduct such hearings concerning the qualifications of the applicant in accordance with its regulations as it may deem necessary. (7)  If the commission desires further investigation be made or desires to conduct any hearings, it shall, within thirty (30) days after presentation of the recommendation of the executive director, so notify the applicant and set a date for hearing. Final action by the commission must be taken within one hundred twenty (120) days after the recommendation of the executive director has been presented to the commission. Failure of the commission to take action within one hundred twenty (120) days shall be deemed to constitute approval of the applicant by the commission, and a license must be issued forthwith upon compliance by the applicant. (8)  The commission has full and absolute power and authority to deny any application for any cause it deems reasonable. If an application is denied, the commission shall prepare and file its written decision upon which its order denying the application is based. SECTION 10.  Section 75-76-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-89. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, all licenses issued to the same person, including a wholly owned subsidiary of that person, for the operation of any game, including a sports pool or race book, which authorize gaming at the same establishment must be merged into a single gaming license.  A gaming license may not be issued to any person if the issuance would result in more than one licensed operation at a single establishment, whether or not the profits or revenue from gaming are shared between the licensed operations. (2) A person who has been issued a gaming license may establish a sports pool or race book on the premises of the establishment at which he conducts a gaming operation only after obtaining permission from the executive director. SECTION 11.  Section 75-76-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-203.  In order to be eligible to receive a state gaming license, a corporation shall: (a)  Be incorporated: (i)  In the State of Mississippi, although such corporation may be a wholly or partly owned subsidiary of a corporation which is chartered in another state of the United States; or (ii)  In another state of the United States, if all persons having any direct or indirect interest of any nature in such corporation are licensed as required by this chapter and any applicable regulations of the commission; (b)  Maintain an office of the corporation on the licensed premises; (c)  Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to corporations; and (d)  Maintain a ledger in the principal office of the corporation in Mississippi, which shall: (i)  At all times reflect the ownership of every class of security issued by the corporation; and (ii)  Be available for inspection by the commission or the executive director or his employees at all reasonable times without notice. SECTION 12.  Section 19-3-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-3-79. (1)  Any person, corporation or other legal entity required to obtain a state gaming license to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as defined in Section 27-109-1, as prescribed by the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall, before applying for such license, provide the Mississippi Gaming Commission with a written notice of intent to apply for a license.  The "notice of intent to apply for a gaming license" shall be on a form prescribed by the executive director of the commission and shall state the county in which the intending licensee desires to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as the case may be.  Within ten (10) days after receipt of a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license, the commission shall require such person, corporation or legal entity to publish the notice once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the intending licensee desires to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as the case may be. (2) If no petition as prescribed in subsection (3) of this section is filed with the board of supervisors of the applicable county within thirty (30) days after the date of the last publication, the board of supervisors of such county shall adopt a resolution stating that no petition was timely filed and that legal gaming may henceforth be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in such county. (3) If a petition signed by twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the registered voters of a county in which a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license is published is filed within thirty (30) days of the date of the last publication with the circuit clerk of the applicable county, the board of supervisors of such county shall authorize the circuit clerk to hold an election on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county on the date upon which such an election may be conducted under subsection (7). The referendum shall be advertised, held, conducted and the result thereof canvassed in the manner provided by law for advertising, holding and canvassing county elections. (4) At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote.  The ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the purpose of the election and the words "FOR LEGAL GAMING ABOARD CRUISE VESSELS (OR VESSELS) IN THE COUNTY AS PRESCRIBED BY LAW" and "AGAINST LEGAL GAMING ABOARD CRUISE VESSELS (OR VESSELS) IN THE COUNTY AS PRESCRIBED BY LAW."  The voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check (√) mark opposite his choice on the proposition.  If a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election shall vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, then legal gaming may henceforth be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county.  If less than a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election shall vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county, then gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, shall be prohibited in the county until such time as a subsequent election, held according to the restrictions specified in subsection (7), may authorize such legal gaming. (5) In any county in which no petition is timely filed after a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license is published, or in which an election is held on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county and a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county, no election shall thereafter be held in that county pursuant to this section on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in that county. (6) Notwithstanding any provision of this section or Sections 97-33-1, 97-33-7, 97-33-17, 97-33-25 and 97-33-27 to the contrary, if an election is held pursuant to this section which causes the conducting of gaming aboard cruise vessels to be prohibited in any county in which one or more cruise vessels were operating out of a port in the county on August 28, 1990, the prohibition on the conducting of gaming aboard cruise vessels in that county shall not apply to the conducting of legal gaming aboard any of those cruise vessels which were still operating out of a port in that county at the time of the election. (7) If an election has been held on the issue of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in a county, and the authority to conduct such legal gaming has been denied by the electors of such county, then a subsequent election on such issue may not be held until: (a) The date of the next succeeding general election in which the election for President of the United States occurs; or (b) In the case in which the authority to conduct such legal gaming has been denied by the electors of such county at elections on three (3) different occasions, whether those occasions be successive or not, the date of the next succeeding general election occurring at least eight (8) years after the last of the three (3) occasions on which the electors denied the authority to conduct such legal gaming. (8) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person, corporation or other legal entity applying for a license for a gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5. SECTION 13.  Section 87-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 87-1-5. If any person, by playing at any game whatever, or by betting on the sides or hands of such as do play at any game, or by betting on any horse race or cockfight, or at any other sport or pastime, or by any wager whatever, shall lose any money, property, or other valuable thing, real or personal, and shall pay or deliver the same or any part thereof, the person so losing and paying or delivering the same, or his wife or children, may sue for and recover such money, property, or other valuable thing so lost and paid or delivered, or any part thereof, from the person knowingly receiving the same, with costs. However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River; (d)  In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 14.  Section 97-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-1. Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, if any person shall encourage, promote or play at any game, play or amusement, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, for money or other valuable thing, or shall wager or bet, promote or encourage the wagering or betting of any money or other valuable things, upon any game, play, amusement, cockfight, Indian ball play or duel, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, or upon the result of any election, event or contingency whatever, upon conviction thereof, he shall be fined in a sum not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and, unless such fine and costs be immediately paid, shall be imprisoned for any period not more than ninety (90) days.  However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (d) In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 15.  Section 97-33-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-7. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, it shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm, copartnership or corporation to have in possession, own, control, display, or operate any cane rack, knife rack, artful dodger, punch board, roll down, merchandise wheel, slot machine, pinball machine, or similar device or devices.  Provided, however, that this section shall not be so construed as to make unlawful the ownership, possession, control, display or operation of any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12, or any music machine or bona fide automatic vending machine where the purchaser receives exactly the same quantity of merchandise on each operation of said machine.  Any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 which delivers, or is so constructed as that by operation thereof it will deliver to the operator thereof anything of value in varying quantities, in addition to the merchandise received, and any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 that is constructed in such manner as that slugs, tokens, coins or similar devices are, or may be, used and delivered to the operator thereof in addition to merchandise of any sort contained in such machine, is hereby declared to be a gambling device, and shall be deemed unlawful under the provisions of this section.  Provided, however, that pinball machines which do not return to the operator or player thereof anything but free additional games or plays shall not be deemed to be gambling devices, and neither this section nor any other law shall be construed to prohibit same. (2) No property right shall exist in any person, natural or artificial, or be vested in such person, in any or all of the devices described herein that are not exempted from the provisions of this section; and all such devices are hereby declared to be at all times subject to confiscation and destruction, and their possession shall be unlawful, except when in the possession of officers carrying out the provisions of this section.  It shall be the duty of all law enforcing officers to seize and immediately destroy all such machines and devices. (3) A first violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and the party offending shall, upon conviction, be fined in any sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.  In the event of a second conviction for a violation of any of the provisions of this section, the party offending shall be subject to a sentence of not less than six (6) months in the county jail, nor more than two (2) years in the State Penitentiary, in the discretion of the trial court. (4) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful to operate any equipment or device described in subsection (1) of this section or any gaming, gambling or similar device or devices by whatever name called while: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (d) In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful (a) to own, possess, repair or control any gambling device, machine or equipment in a licensed gaming establishment or on the business premises appurtenant to any such licensed gaming establishment during any period of time in which such licensed gaming establishment is being constructed, repaired, maintained or operated in this state; (b) to install any gambling device, machine or equipment in any licensed gaming establishment; (c) to possess or control any gambling device, machine or equipment during the process of procuring or transporting such device, machine or equipment for installation on any such licensed gaming establishment; or (d) to store in a warehouse or other storage facility any gambling device, machine, equipment, or part thereof, regardless of whether the county or municipality in which the warehouse or storage facility is located has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, provided that such device, machine or equipment is operated only in a county or municipality that has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels.  Any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired, transported or stored in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to confiscation, seizure or destruction, and any person, firm, partnership or corporation which owns, possesses, controls, installs, procures, repairs, transports or stores any gambling device, machine or equipment in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to any prosecution or penalty under this section.  Any person constructing or repairing such cruise vessels or vessels within a municipality shall comply with all municipal ordinances protecting the general health or safety of the residents of the municipality. SECTION 16.  Section 97-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-17. (1)  All monies exhibited for the purpose of betting or alluring persons to bet at any game, and all monies staked or betted, shall be liable to seizure by any sheriff, constable, or police officer, together with all the appliances used or kept for use in gambling, or by any other person; and all the monies so seized shall be accounted for by the person making the seizure, and all appliances seized shall be destroyed; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering on: (a) A cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) A vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (d) In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (2) Nothing in this section shall apply to any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7. SECTION 17.  Section 97-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-25. If any person shall sell or buy, either directly or indirectly, any chance in what is commonly called pool, upon any event whatever, or shall in any manner engage in such business or pastime, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (d) In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 18.  Section 97-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-27. If any person shall bet on a horse race or a yacht race or on a shooting match, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and, unless the fine and costs be immediately paid, he shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a) On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b) In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i) The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii) The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii) In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *.; (c) On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (d) In a licensed gaming establishment that is part of a project as defined in Section 75-76-5; or ( * * *de)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 19.  Section 27-109-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-109-1. (1)  The provisions of this chapter shall be administered by the State Tax Commission, which shall administer them for the protection of the public and in the public interest in accordance with the policy of this state. (2) (a)  The operator of any cruise vessel or vessel operating within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi shall be required to apply for and obtain a privilege license from the State Tax Commission. (b) For purposes of this chapter, the operator of any cruise vessel or vessel shall be identified as any owner or lessee which is vested with the authority and responsibility to manage daily operations of any such cruise vessel or vessel. (c) (i)  For purposes of this chapter, the term "cruise vessel" shall mean a vessel which complies with all United States Coast Guard regulations, having a minimum overall length of one hundred fifty (150) feet and a minimum draft of six (6) feet and which is certified to carry at least two hundred (200) passengers; and the term "vessel" shall mean a vessel having a minimum overall length of one hundred fifty (150) feet.  The term "vessel" shall also mean a "cruise vessel" as referred to in Section 27-109-11.  For the purposes of a "vessel" as that term is defined in this section, "navigable waters" means any rivers, creeks, bayous or other bodies of water within any county in this state bordering on the Mississippi River that are used or susceptible of being used as an artery of commerce and which either in their natural or improved condition are used or suitable for use as an artery of commerce or are used for the docking or mooring of a vessel, notwithstanding interruptions between the navigable parts of such rivers, creeks, bayous or other bodies of water by falls, shallows, or rapids compelling land carriage.  The term "cruise vessel" or "vessel" also includes a structure as described in Section 97-33-1(b). (ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the definitions of the words "person" and "gaming license" shall have the meanings ascribed to those words and terms in Section 75-76-5.  After July 1, 2005, any person possessing a valid gaming license to conduct legal gaming on a cruise vessel or vessel may construct permanent structures upon which to place the vessel or cruise vessel where the licensee has received approval to offer legal gaming.  Such permanent structures shall be included within the meanings of the terms "cruise vessel" and "vessel" under subparagraph (i). In the event that such a gaming licensee constructs permanent structures under this subparagraph, the requirement that a cruise vessel have a minimum draft of six (6) feet shall not apply.  This subparagraph shall not authorize any form of inland gaming or the conducting of legal gaming on a vessel or cruise vessel which is not on, in or above water, as contemplated under subparagraph (i) and Section 97-33-1. (3) The commission and its agents may: (a) Inspect and examine all premises on the cruise vessel. (b) Inspect all equipment and supplies in, upon or about such premises. (c) Summarily seize and remove from such premises and impound any equipment or supplies for the purpose of examination and inspection. (d) Demand access to and inspect, examine, photocopy and audit all papers, books and records of applicants and licensees, on their premises, or elsewhere as practicable, and in the presence of the licensee or his agent, respecting all matters affecting the enforcement of the policy or any of the provisions of this chapter. (4) For the purpose of conducting audits after the cessation of operations by a licensee, the former licensee shall furnish, upon demand of an agent of the commission, books, papers and records as necessary to conduct the audits.  The former licensee shall maintain all books, papers and records necessary for audits for a period of one (1) year after the date of the surrender or revocation of his privilege license.  If the former licensee seeks judicial review of a deficiency determination or files a petition for a redetermination, he must maintain all books, papers and records until a final order is entered on the determination. (5) The commission may investigate, for the purpose of prosecution, any suspected criminal violation of the provisions of this chapter.  For the purpose of the administration and enforcement of this chapter, the commission and the executive, supervisory and investigative personnel of the commission have the powers of a peace officer of this state. (6) The commission, or any of its members, has full power and authority to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses at any place within this state, to administer oaths and to require testimony under oath.  Any process or notice may be served in the manner provided for service of process and notices in civil actions.  The commission may pay such transportation and other expense of witnesses as it may deem reasonable and proper. Any person making false oath in any matter before the commission is guilty of perjury.  The commission, or any member thereof, may appoint hearing examiners who may administer oaths and receive evidence and testimony under oath. SECTION 20.  Section 95-3-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 95-3-25. Any building, club, vessel, boat, place or room, wherein is kept or exhibited any game or gaming table, commonly called A.B.C. or E.O. roulette, or rowley-powley, or rouquetnoir, roredo, keno, monte, or any faro-bank, dice, or other game, gaming table, or bank of the same or like kind, or any other kind or description of gambling device under any other name whatever, and any such place where information is furnished for the purpose of making and settling bets or wagers on any horse race, prize fight, or on the outcome of any like event, or where bets or wagers are arranged for, made or settled, shall be deemed to be a common nuisance and may be abated by writ of injunction, issued out of a court of equity upon a bill filed in the name of the state by the Attorney General, or any district or county attorney, whose duty requires him to prosecute criminal cases on behalf of the state in the county where the nuisance is maintained, or by any citizen or citizens of such county, such bill to be filed in the county in which the nuisance exists.  And all rules of evidence and of practice and procedure that pertain to courts of equity generally in this state may be invoked and applied in any injunction procedure hereunder.  The provisions of this section shall not apply to any form of gaming or gambling that is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi or to a licensed gaming establishment and shall not apply to any licensed gaming establishment having on its premises any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7. Upon the abatement of any such nuisance, any person found to be the owner, operator or exhibitor of any gambling device described in the first paragraph of this section may be required by the court to enter into a good and sufficient bond in such amount as may be deemed proper by the court, to be conditioned that the obligor therein will not violate any of the laws of Mississippi pertaining to gaming or gambling for a period of not to exceed two (2) years from the date thereof.  The failure to make such bond shall be a contempt of court and for such contempt the person or party shall be confined in the county jail until such bond is made, but not longer than two (2) years.  Said bond shall be approved by the clerk of the court where the proceedings were had and shall be filed as a part of the record of such case. SECTION 21.  Section 67-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-5.  For the purposes of this article and unless otherwise required by the context: (a)  "Alcoholic beverage" means any alcoholic liquid, including wines of more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight, capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being, but shall not include light wine, light spirit product and beer, as defined in Section 67-3-3, but shall include native wines, native spirits, and craft spirits.  The words "alcoholic beverage" shall not include ethyl alcohol manufactured or distilled solely for fuel purposes or beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if the beer is legally manufactured in this state for sale in another state. (b) "Alcohol" means the product of distillation of any fermented liquid, whatever the origin thereof, and includes synthetic ethyl alcohol, but does not include denatured alcohol or wood alcohol. (c)  "Distilled spirits" means any beverage containing more than six percent (6%) of alcohol by weight produced by distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar, including dilutions and mixtures of these beverages. (d)  "Wine" or "vinous liquor" means any product obtained from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe grapes, fruits, honey or berries and made in accordance with the revenue laws of the United States. (e)  "Person" means and includes any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity whatsoever. (f) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in manufacturing, distilling, rectifying, blending or bottling any alcoholic beverage. (g)  "Wholesaler" means any person, other than a manufacturer, engaged in distributing or selling any alcoholic beverage at wholesale for delivery within or without this state when such sale is for the purpose of resale by the purchaser. (h) "Retailer" means any person who sells, distributes, or offers for sale or distribution, any alcoholic beverage for use or consumption by the purchaser and not for resale. (i)  "State Tax Commission," "commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi, which shall create a division in its organization to be known as the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.  Any reference to the commission or the department hereafter means the powers and duties of the Department of Revenue with reference to supervision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. (j) "Division" means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (k) "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town of this state. (l)  "Hotel" means an establishment within a municipality, or within a qualified resort area approved as such by the department, where, in consideration of payment, food and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located at least twenty (20) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations.  Hotels in towns or cities of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) population are similarly defined except that they must have fifty (50) or more sleeping rooms.  Any such establishment described in this paragraph with less than fifty (50) beds shall operate one or more regular dining rooms designed to be constantly frequented by customers each day.  When used in this article, the word "hotel" shall also be construed to include any establishment that meets the definition of "bed and breakfast inn" as provided in this section. (m) "Restaurant" means: (i)  A place which is regularly and in a bona fide manner used and kept open for the serving of meals to guests for compensation, which has suitable seating facilities for guests, and which has suitable kitchen facilities connected therewith for cooking an assortment of foods and meals commonly ordered at various hours of the day; the service of such food as sandwiches and salads only shall not be deemed in compliance with this requirement.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, no place shall qualify as a restaurant under this article unless twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the revenue derived from such place shall be from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, or unless the value of food given to and consumed by customers is equal to twenty-five percent (25%) or more of total revenue; or (ii)  Any privately owned business located in a building in a historic district where the district is listed in the National Register of Historic Places, where the building has a total occupancy rating of not less than one thousand (1,000) and where the business regularly utilizes ten thousand (10,000) square feet or more in the building for live entertainment, including not only the stage, lobby or area where the audience sits and/or stands, but also any other portion of the building necessary for the operation of the business, including any kitchen area, bar area, storage area and office space, but excluding any area for parking.  In addition to the other requirements of this subparagraph, the business must also serve food to guests for compensation within the building and derive the majority of its revenue from event-related fees, including, but not limited to, admission fees or ticket sales to live entertainment in the building, and from the rental of all or part of the facilities of the business in the building to another party for a specific event or function. (n)  "Club" means an association or a corporation: (i)  Organized or created under the laws of this state for a period of five (5) years prior to July 1, 1966; (ii)  Organized not primarily for pecuniary profit but for the promotion of some common object other than the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages; (iii)  Maintained by its members through the payment of annual dues; (iv)  Owning, hiring or leasing a building or space in a building of such extent and character as may be suitable and adequate for the reasonable and comfortable use and accommodation of its members and their guests; (v)  The affairs and management of which are conducted by a board of directors, board of governors, executive committee, or similar governing body chosen by the members at a regular meeting held at some periodic interval; and (vi)  No member, officer, agent or employee of which is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of a salary or other compensation any profit from the distribution or sale of alcoholic beverages to the club or to members or guests of the club beyond such salary or compensation as may be fixed and voted at a proper meeting by the board of directors or other governing body out of the general revenues of the club. The department may, in its discretion, waive the five-year provision of this paragraph.  In order to qualify under this paragraph, a club must file with the department, at the time of its application for a license under this article, two (2) copies of a list of the names and residences of its members and similarly file, within ten (10) days after the election of any additional member, his name and address.  Each club applying for a license shall also file with the department at the time of the application a copy of its articles of association, charter of incorporation, bylaws or other instruments governing the business and affairs thereof. (o)  "Qualified resort area" means any area or locality outside of the limits of incorporated municipalities in this state commonly known and accepted as a place which regularly and customarily attracts tourists, vacationists and other transients because of its historical, scenic or recreational facilities or attractions, or because of other attributes which regularly and customarily appeal to and attract tourists, vacationists and other transients in substantial numbers; however, no area or locality shall so qualify as a resort area until it has been duly and properly approved as such by the department. The department may not approve an area as a qualified resort area after July 1, 2018, if any portion of such proposed area is located within two (2) miles of a convent or monastery that is located in a county traversed by Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 98.  A convent or monastery may waive such distance restrictions in favor of allowing approval by the department of an area as a qualified resort area.  Such waiver shall be in written form from the owner, the governing body, or the appropriate officer of the convent or monastery having the authority to execute such a waiver, and the waiver shall be filed with and verified by the department before becoming effective. (i)  The department may approve an area or locality outside of the limits of an incorporated municipality that is in the process of being developed as a qualified resort area if such area or locality, when developed, can reasonably be expected to meet the requisites of the definition of the term "qualified resort area."  In such a case, the status of qualified resort area shall not take effect until completion of the development. (ii)  The term includes any state park which is declared a resort area by the department; however, such declaration may only be initiated in a written request for resort area status made to the department by the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and no permit for the sale of any alcoholic beverage, as defined in this article, except an on-premises retailer's permit, shall be issued for a hotel, restaurant or bed and breakfast inn in such park. (iii)  The term includes: 1.  The clubhouses associated with the state park golf courses at the Lefleur's Bluff State Park, the John Kyle State Park, the Percy Quin State Park and the Hugh White State Park; 2.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities where the golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities are adjacent to one or more planned residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least seven hundred fifty (750) acres and at least four hundred (400) residential units; 3.  Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least three thousand (3,000) contiguous acres with no public roads and that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility; 4.  Any facility located on federal property surrounding a lake and designated as a recreational area by the United States Army Corps of Engineers that consists of at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) acres; 5.  Any facility that is located in a municipality that is bordered by the Pearl River, traversed by Mississippi Highway 25, adjacent to the boundaries of the Jackson International Airport and is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law; however, any such facility may only be located in areas designated by the governing authorities of such municipality; 6.  Any municipality with a population in excess of ten thousand (10,000) according to the latest federal decennial census that is located in a county that is bordered by the Pearl River and is not traversed by Interstate Highway 20, with a population in excess of forty-five thousand (45,000) according to the latest federal decennial census; 7.  The West Pearl Restaurant Tax District as defined in Chapter 912, Local and Private Laws of 2007; 8.  a.  Land that is located in any county in which Mississippi Highway 43 and Mississippi Highway 25 intersect and: A. Owned by the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, and/or B. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, east of Old Fannin Road, north of Regatta Drive, south of Spillway Road, west of Hugh Ward Boulevard and accessible by Old Fannin Road, Spillway Road, Spann Drive and/or Lake Vista Place, and/or C. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, west of Old Fannin Road, south of Spillway Road and extending to the boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Flowood, Mississippi; b.  The board of supervisors of such county, with respect to B and C of item 8.a., may by resolution or other order: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale, B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, and C. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 9.  Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least eight hundred (800) contiguous acres with no public roads, that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility, and has accommodations for at least fifty (50) overnight guests; 10.  Any facility that: a. Consists of at least six thousand (6,000) square feet being heated and cooled along with an additional adjacent area that consists of at least two thousand two hundred (2,200) square feet regardless of whether heated and cooled, b.  For a fee is used to host events such as weddings, reunions and conventions, c. Provides lodging accommodations regardless of whether part of the facility and/or located adjacent to or in close proximity to the facility, and d.  Is located on property that consists of at least thirty (30) contiguous acres; 11.  Any facility and related property: a. Located on property that consists of at least one hundred twenty-five (125) contiguous acres and consisting of an eighteen-hole golf course, and/or located in a facility that consists of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled, b.  Used for the purpose of providing meals and hosting events, and c.  Used for the purpose of teaching culinary arts courses and/or turf management and grounds keeping courses, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses; 12.  Any facility and related property that: a. Consist of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled, b.  For a fee is used to host events, c.  Is used for the purpose of culinary arts courses, and/or live entertainment courses and art performances, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses; 13.  The clubhouse and associated golf course where the golf course is adjacent to one or more residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least two hundred (200) acres and at least one hundred fifty (150) residential units and are located a. in a county that has voted against coming out from under the dry law; and b. outside of but in close proximity to a municipality in such county which has voted under Section 67-1-14, after January 1, 2013, to come out from under the dry law; 14.  The clubhouse and associated eighteen-hole golf course located in a municipality traversed by Interstate Highway 55 and U.S. Highway 51 that has voted to come out from under the dry law; 15.  a.  Land that is planned for mixed-use development and consists of at least two hundred (200) contiguous acres with one or more planned residential developments collectively planned to include at least two hundred (200) residential units when completed, and also including a facility that consists of at least four thousand (4,000) square feet that is not part of such land but is located adjacent to or in close proximity thereto, and in addition, also including land located and beginning outside of and adjacent to the south boundary of the corporate limits of a municipality on South Montgomery Street and running approximately one (1) mile west outside of and along such corporate limits, then running in a straight line parallel to South Montgomery Street south to Poor House Road, then running east along Poor House Road to South Montgomery Street, and then running north along South Montgomery Street back to the point of beginning, and which land is located: A. In a county that has voted to come out from under the dry law, B. Outside the corporate limits of any municipality in such county and adjacent to or in close proximity to a golf course located in a municipality in such county, and C. Within one (1) mile of a state institution of higher learning; b.  The board of supervisors of such county may by resolution or other order: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale, B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, and C. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 16.  Any facility with a capacity of five hundred (500) people or more, to be used as a venue for private events, on a tract of land in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, Township 2 South, Range 7 East, of a county where U.S. Highway 45 and U.S. Highway 72 intersect and that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 17.  One hundred five (105) contiguous acres, more or less, located in Hinds County, Mississippi, and in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, whereon are constructed a variety of buildings, improvements, grounds or objects for the purpose of holding events thereon to promote agricultural and industrial development in Mississippi; 18.  Land that is owned by a state institution of higher learning, land that is owned by an entity that is bound by an affiliation agreement with a state institution of higher learning, or land that is owned by one or more other entities so long as such other entities are solely owned, either directly or through additional entities, by an institution of higher learning and/or one or more entities bound by affiliation agreements with such institution, and: a. Located entirely within a county that has elected by majority vote not to permit the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of light wine and beer pursuant to Section 67-3-7; and b.  A. Located adjacent to but outside the incorporated limits of a municipality that has elected by majority vote to permit the sale, receipt, storage and transportation of light wine and beer pursuant to Section 67-3-9; or B. Located in an area bounded on the north by College View Drive, on the east by Mississippi Highway 12 East, on the south by Mississippi Highway 12 East, on the west by Mill Street, on the north by Russell Street, then on the west by Colonel Muldrow Avenue, on the north by University Drive, on the west by Adkerson Way within a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 25, Mississippi Highway 12 and U.S. Highway 82. If any portion of the land described in this item 18 has been declared a qualified resort area by the department before July 1, 2020, then that qualified resort area shall be incorporated into the qualified resort area created by this item 18; 19.  Any facility and related property: a.  Used as a flea market or similar venue during a weekend (Saturday and Sunday) immediately preceding the first Monday of a month and having an annual average of at least one thousand (1,000) visitors for each such weekend and five hundred (500) vendors for Saturday of each such weekend, and b. Located in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law and outside of but in close proximity to a municipality located in such county and which municipality has voted to come out from under the dry law; 20.  Blocks 1, 2 and 3 of the original town square in any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) according to the latest federal decennial census and which is located in: a.  A county traversed by Interstate 55 and Interstate 20, and b.  A judicial district that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 21.  Any municipality with a population in excess of two thousand (2,000) according to the latest federal decennial census and in which is located a part of White's Creek Lake and in which U.S. Highway 82 intersects with Mississippi Highway 9 and located in a county that is partially bordered on one (1) side by the Big Black River; 22.  A restaurant located on a two-acre tract adjacent to a five-hundred-fifty-acre lake in the northeast corner of a county traversed by U.S. Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 84; 23.  Any tracts of land in Oktibbeha County, situated north of Bailey Howell Drive, Lee Boulevard and Old Mayhew Road, east of George Perry Street and south of Mississippi Highway 182, and not located on the property of a state institution of higher learning; however, the board of supervisors of such county may by resolution or other order: a. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale; b. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and c.  Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 24.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 27 and Mississippi Highway 28 intersect; 25.  A municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 35 and Interstate 20; 26.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 16 and Mississippi Highway 35 intersect; 27.  A municipality in which U.S. Highway 82 and Old Highway 61 intersect; 28.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 8 meets Mississippi Highway 1; 29.  A municipality in which U.S. Highway 82 and Mississippi Highway 1 intersect; 30.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 50 meets Mississippi Highway 9; 31.  An area bounded on the north by Pearl Street, on the east by West Street, on the south by Court Street and on the west by Farish Street, within a municipality bordered on the east by the Pearl River and through which run Interstate 20 and Interstate 55; 32.  Any facility and related property that: a.  Is contracted for mixed-use development improvements consisting of office and residential space and a restaurant and lounge, partially occupying the renovated space of a four-story commercial building which previously served as a financial institution; and adjacent property to the west consisting of a single-story office building that was originally occupied by the Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of American Local Number 569; and b.  Is situated on a tract of land consisting of approximately one and one-tenth (1.10) acres, and the adjacent property to the west consisting of approximately 0.5 acres, located in a municipality which is the seat of county government, situated south of Interstate 10, traversed by U.S. Highway 90, partially bordered on one (1) side by the Pascagoula River and having its most southern boundary bordered by the Gulf of Mexico, with a population greater than twenty-two thousand (22,000) according to the 2010 federal decennial census; however, the governing authorities of such a municipality may by ordinance: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale; B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and C. Designate the areas within the  facilities in which alcoholic beverages may be offered for sale; 33.  Any facility with a maximum capacity of one hundred twenty (120) people that consists of at least three thousand (3,000) square feet being heated and cooled, has a commercial kitchen, has a pavilion that consists of at least nine thousand (9,000) square feet and is located on land more particularly described as follows: All that part of the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi, that lies South of Mississippi State Highway 348 right-of-way and containing 19.48 acres, more or less. ALSO, The Northeast 38 acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi. ALSO, The South 81 1/2 acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi; 34. A municipality in which U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect; 35.  A municipality in which Interstate 20 passes over Mississippi Highway 15; 36.  Any municipality that is bordered in its northwestern boundary by the Pearl River, traversed by U.S. Highway 49 and Interstate 20, and is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law; 37.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 28 and Mississippi Highway 29 North intersect; 38. An area bounded as follows within a municipality through which run Interstate 22 and Mississippi Highway 15:  Beginning at a point at the intersection of Bankhead Street and Tallahatchie Trails; then running to a point at the intersection of Tallahatchie Trails and Interstate 22; then running to a point at the intersection of Interstate 22 and Carter Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Carter Avenue and Camp Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Camp Avenue and King Street; then running to a point at the intersection of King Street and E. Main Street; then running to a point at the intersection of E. Main Street and Camp Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Camp Avenue and Highland Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Highland Street and Adams Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Adams Street and Cleveland Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Cleveland Street and N. Railroad Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of N. Railroad Avenue and McGill Street; then running to a point at the intersection of McGill Street and Snyder Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Snyder Street and Bankhead Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Bankhead Street and Tallahatchie Trails and the point of the beginning; 39.  A municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 43 and U.S. Highway 80; 40.  The coliseum in a municipality in which U.S. Highway 72 passes over U.S. Highway 45; 41.  A piece of property on the northeast corner of the T-intersection where Builders Square Drive meets Mississippi Highway 471; 42.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities located on Oaks Country Club Road less than one-half (1/2) mile to the east of Mississippi Highway 15; 43.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: The East Half (E 1/2) of the Southwest Quarter (SW 1/4) of Section 15, Township 3 North, Range 2 East; a 4 acre parcel in the Southwest Corner of the Southwest Quarter (SW 1/4) of the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/4), Section 15, Township 3 North, Range 2 East, running 210 feet east and west and 840 feet running north and south; the Northeast Quarter (NE 1/4) of the Northwest Quarter (NW 1/4) of Section 22, Township 3 North, Range 2 East, all in Rankin County, Mississippi; 44.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point 1915 feet west and 2171 feet north of southeast corner, Section 11, Township 24 North, Range 2 West, Second Judicial District, Tallahatchie County, Mississippi, which point is the southwest corner of J.C. Section Lot mentioned in deed recorded in Book 50, page 34, in the records of the Chancery Clerk's Office at Sumner, in said District of said County; thence South 80° West, 19 feet to the east boundary of United States Highway 49-E, thence East along the east boundary of said Highway 270 feet to point of beginning of Lot to be conveyed; thence southeast along the east boundary of said Highway 204 feet to a concrete post at the intersection of the east boundary of said Highway with the west boundary of gravel road from Sumner to Webb, known as Oil Mill Road, thence Northwest along west boundary of said Oil Mill Road 194 feet to center of driveway running southwest from said Oil Mill Road to U.S. Highway 49-E; thence South 66° West along center of said driveway 128 feet to point of beginning, being situated in Northwest Quarter of Southeast Quarter of Section 11, together with all improvements situated thereon; 45.  Any facility that: a. Consists of at least five thousand six hundred (5,600) square feet being heated and cooled along with a lakeside patio that consists of at least two thousand two hundred (2,200) square feet, regardless of whether such patio is part of the facility and/or located adjacent to or in close proximity to the facility; b. Includes a caterer's kitchen and green room for entertainment preparation; c.  For a fee is used to host events; and d.  Is located adjacent to or in close proximity to an approximately nine-acre lake on property that consists of at least one hundred twenty (120) acres in a county traversed by Mississippi Highway 15 and U.S. Highway 278; 46.  Any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand (1,000) according to the 2010 federal decennial census and which is located in a county that is traversed by U.S. Highways 84 and 98 and has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 47.  The clubhouse and associated nine-hole golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities located on or near U.S. Highway 82 between Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 9; 48.  The downtown square area bound by East Service Drive, Commerce Street, Second Street and Court Street and adjacent properties in a municipality through which run Interstate 55, U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 306; 49.  All parcels zoned for mixed-use development located west of Mississippi Highway 589, more than four hundred (400) feet north of Old Highway 24, east of Parkers Creek and Black Creek, and south of J M Burge Road; 50.  Any facility used by a soccer club and located on Old Highway 11 between one-tenth (0.1) and two-tenths (0.2) of a mile from its intersection with Oak Grove Road, in a county in which U.S. Highway 98 and Mississippi Highway 589 intersect; 51.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 469 intersect; 52.  Any facility that is: a.  Owned by a Veterans of Foreign Wars (VFW) organization that is a nonprofit corporation and registered with the Mississippi Secretary of State; b.  Used by such organization for its headquarters and other organization related purposes; and c. Located outside of a municipality in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 53.  The following within a municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. 61 Highway intersect and through which flows the Sunflower River: a.  An area bounded as follows:  Starting at the southern point of the intersection of Sunflower Avenue and 1st Street and going south along said avenue on its eastern side to 8th Street, then going east along said street on its northern side to West Tallahatchie Street, then going north along said street on its western side to 4th Street/Martin Luther King Boulevard, then going east along said street/boulevard on its northern side to Desoto Avenue, then going north along said avenue on its western side to 1st Street, then going west along said street on its southern side to the point of beginning along the southern side of Court Street; b.  Lots located at or near the intersection of Madison Avenue, Walnut Street, and Riverside Avenue that are in a commercial zone; and c.  Any facility located on the west side of Sunflower Avenue to the Sunflower River between the southern side of 6th Street and the northern side of 8th Street and which is operated as and/or was operated as a hotel or lodging facility, in consideration of payment, regardless of whether the facility meets the criteria for the definition of the term "hotel" in paragraph (l) of this section; and d.  Any facility located on the west side of Sunflower Avenue to the Sunflower River between the southern side of 3rd Street and the northern side of 4th Street/Martin Luther King Boulevard and which is operated as and/or was operated as a musical venue, in consideration of payment; 54.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 340 meets Mississippi Highway 15; 55.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 540 and Mississippi Highway 149 intersect; 56.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 345/Main Street intersect; 57.  The property and structures thereon at the following locations within a municipality through which run U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 145 and in which Mississippi Highway 370 and Mississippi Highway 145 intersect:  104 West Main Street, 106 West Main Street, 108 West Main Street, 110 West Main Street and 112 West Main Street; 58.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 11 and Main Street intersect and which is located in a county having two (2) judicial districts; 59.  Any municipality in which Interstate 22 passes over Mississippi Highway 9; 60.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: A certain parcel of land being situated in the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Commence at an existing 1/2" iron pin marking the Southwest corner of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E and run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 for a distance of 33.18 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4, run thence South 89 degrees 53 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 2.08 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds East for a distance of 561.90 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East for a distance of 76.42 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin marking the POINT OF BEGINNING of the parcel of land herein described; from said POINT OF BEGINNING, continue thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East along an existing fence for a distance of 493.27 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 03 degrees 08 minutes 15 seconds East for a distance of 170.22 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin on the North line of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9; run thence North 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds East along said North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 1,305.51 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin marking Northeast corner thereof; leaving said North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, run thence South 00 degrees 08 minutes 35 seconds West along the East line of said Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 663.19 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, run thence South 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds West for a distance of 1,315.51 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 20.00 acres, more or less. And Also:  An easement for the purpose of ingress and egress being situated in the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 and in the Northeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Begin at an existing 1/2" iron pin marking the Southwest corner of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E and run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 for a distance of 33.18 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4, run thence South 89 degrees 53 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 2.08 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds East for a distance of 561.90 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East for a distance of 76.42 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds West for a distance of 76.66 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds West for a distance of 619.81 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 89 degrees 43 minutes 01 seconds West for a distance of 26.81 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the West line of the aforesaid Northeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 25.00 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 17,525.4 square feet, more or less. 61.  Any municipality bordered on the east by the Pascagoula River and on the south by the Mississippi Sound; 62.  The property and structures thereon located at parcel numbers 4969 198 000; 4969 200 000; 4969 201 000; 4969 206 000; 4969 207 000; 4969 208 000; 4969 218 000; 4969 199; 4969 204 000 and 4969 204 001, all in Block 4 of the original town square in any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) according to the latest federal decennial census and which is located in: a.  A county traversed by Interstate 55 and Interstate 20, and b.  A judicial district that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 63.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 12 meets Mississippi Highway 17; 64.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 469 intersect; 65.  The clubhouse and associated nine-hole golf course and related facilities located on or near the eastern corner of the point at which Golf Course Road meets Athens Road, in a county in which Mississippi Highway 13 and Mississippi Highway 28 intersect, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.900370078041004, -89.7928067652611; 66.  Any facility located at the south-to-southwest corner of the intersection of Madison Street and Bolton Brownsville Road, in a municipality in which Bolton Brownsville Road passes over Interstate 20, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.349067271758955, -90.4596221146197; 67.  Any facility located at the northwest corner of the intersection of Depot Street and Madison Street, in a municipality in which Bolton Brownsville Road passes over Interstate 20, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.34903152971068, -90.46047660172901; 68.  Any facility located on Hinds Boulevard approximately three-tenths (0.3) of a mile south of the point at which Hinds Boulevard diverges from Clinton Road, in a municipality whose northern boundary partially consists of Snake Creek Road, and whose southern boundary partially consists of Mississippi Highway 18, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.26384517526713, -90.41586570183475; 69.  Any facility located on Pleasant Grove Drive approximately one and three-tenths (1.3) miles southeast of its intersection with Harmony Drive, in a county through which run Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 84, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.512043770371907, -90.2506094382595; 70.  Any facility located immediately north of the intersection of two roads, both named Mason Clark Drive, located between two-tenths (0.2) and three-tenths (0.3) of a mile southwest of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.135950529733048, -88.53068674585575; 71.  Any facility located on Raj Road approximately three-tenths (0.3) of a mile south of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.139553708288418, -88.53411203512971; 72.  Any facility located on Raj Road approximately one-tenth (0.1) of a mile south of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.14184097577295, -88.53287700849411; 73.  Any municipality through which run U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 145 and in which Mississippi Highway 370 and Mississippi Highway 145 intersect; however, this designation as a qualified resort area shall only apply to the portion of such municipality which is located in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 74.  A municipality through which runs a portion of the Tanglefoot Trail and in which Mississippi Highway 32 and East Front Street intersect; 75.  Lot Three (3) in Block One Hundred Seventy-eight (178) of the D.H. McInnis First Survey, sometimes referred to as D.H. McInnis Railroad Addition, to the City of Hattiesburg, the said lot having a frontage of thirty (30) feet on the Eastern side of Front Street and extending back between parallel lines ninety (90) feet to an alley, and being located in the Northwest Quarter of Section 10, Township 4 North, Range 13 West, Forrest County, Mississippi; 76.  An area of land in George County of approximately eight and five hundredths (8.05) acres, bordered on the east and northeast by Brushy Creek, on the northwest by Brushy Creek Road, on the west by Beaver Creek Road, and on the south by a property boundary running east and west; 77.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 intersects with Webster Street, and in which Webster Street splits into Mill Street and Maben Starkville Road; 78.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 492 meets Mississippi Highway 35; 79.  A facility operating as an event venue and located on Mississippi Highway 589, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.36730, -89.50548; 80.  An area situated in the SW 1/4 of Section 12, T7N-R2E, Madison County, Mississippi, and commencing at the point on the Ross Barnett Reservoir directly east of the intersection of North Natchez Street and Louisiana Street, then go west on Louisiana Street to the intersection of Louisiana Street and Andrew Jackson Street, then west on Andrew Jackson Street to the intersection of Andrew Jackson Street and Choctaw Street, then north on Choctaw Street to the intersection of Choctaw Street and Republic Street, then west on Republic Street to the intersection of Republic Street and Port Street, then north on Port Street to the Natchez Trace right-of-way, then east on the Natchez Trace right-of-way to the Ross Barnett Reservoir, then following the Ross Barnett Reservoir south back to the point of beginning; 81.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a fence corner at the Northeast corner of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East, Union County, Mississippi, for the point of beginning; thence run South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the Section line, a distance of 161.83 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence North 88 degrees 20 minutes 48 seconds West, along a fence, a distance of 1221.09 feet to a one-half iron pin, thence South 09 degrees 45 minutes 37 seconds West, along a fence, a distance of 61.49 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence North 84 degrees l8 minutes 01 seconds West, along a fence, (passing through a one-half inch iron pin at 196.83 feet) a distance of 234.62 feet to a mag-nail on the centerline of Union County Road No. 137, thence North 11 degrees 00 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of 187.87 feet to a one-half inch iron pin on the West edge of said road, thence North 29 degrees 41 minutes 28 seconds East a distance of 59.28 feet to a point on the centerline of said road, thence South 89 degrees 13 minutes 02 seconds East (passing through a one-half inch iron pin at 30.0 feet) along the South line of the Bernard Whiteside property as recorded in Deed Book 117, Pages 517-518 and Deed Book 214, page 109, a distance of 646.07 feet to a concrete monument, thence South 89 degrees 13 minutes 02 seconds East a distance of 751.31 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the aforesaid Section line, a distance of 52.93 feet to the point of beginning, said tract lying in the Southeast Quarter of Section 27, and the Northeast Quarter of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East and containing 6.99 acres. Subject to a perpetual all purpose non-exclusive easement for ingress, egress and public utilities together the right to enter upon the above described property and do any and all work necessary to build, repair and maintain a roadway or well or install public utilities all over upon and across the following described property: A 25.0 foot easement for ingress and egress, being 12.5 feet to the right and 12.5 feet to the left of the following described centerline:  Commencing at a fence corner at the Northeast corner of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East, Union County, Mississippi, thence run South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the Section line, a distance of 149.33 feet to the point of beginning; thence North 88 degrees 20 minutes 48 seconds West a distance of 1231.46 feet to a point, thence South 09 degrees 45 minutes 37 seconds West a distance of 61.49 feet to a point, thence North 84 degrees 18 minutes 01 seconds West a distance of 221.82 feet to a point on the centerline of Union County Road #137, said tract lying in the Northeast Quarter of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East; 82.  A country club located: a.  In a county in which Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect and which county has not voted to come out from under the dry law, and b. Outside the corporate limits of any municipality in such county and within one (1) mile of the corporate limits of a municipality that is the county seat of such county; 83.  Any facility located on North Jackson Street in a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 8 and Mississippi Highway 15, with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.913692, -89.005219; 84.  Any facility located on North Jackson Street in a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 8 and Mississippi Highway 15, with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.905581, -89.00200; 85.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the Southeast corner of Section 4, Township 6 South, Range 18 West, Pearl River County, Mississippi; thence West 1310.00 feet to a T-bar; thence North 745.84 feet; thence East 132.00 feet to a 1" iron pipe; thence North 83.61 feet for the Point of Beginning; thence South 79 degrees 02 minutes 61 seconds West 248.28 feet; thence West 76.35 feet; thence North 20 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West 185.54 feet; thence North 52 degrees 43 minutes 14 seconds East 365.98 feet to a 1" iron pipe on the West margin of Henry Smith Road, a gravel/paved, public road; thence along said margin South 17 degrees 59 minutes 13 seconds East 299.09 feet; thence South 64.39 feet to the Point of Beginning.  This parcel containing 2.19 acres and being a part of the East 1/2 of Section 4, Township 6 South, Range 18 West, Pearl River County, Mississippi. INDEXING:  BEING A PART OF THE EAST 1/2 OF SECTION 4, TOWNSHIP 6 SOUTH, RANGE 18 WEST, PEARL RIVER COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI; 86.  Any facility located on land in a county through which run Mississippi Highway 25 and U.S. Highway 82 and more particularly described as follows:  Beginning at a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.331869, -88.715054; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.336207, -88.713453; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.335369, -88.709835; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.330870, -88.711496; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.331869, -88.715054 and the point of the beginning; 87.  Any facility located on land that is owned by a community college that is located in a county through which run U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 4; 88.  Any facility located on Mississippi Highway 23/178 in a municipality in which Mississippi Highway 23/178 and Stone Drive intersect, with GPS coordinates of approximately 34.235269, -88.262409; 89.  Any facility located on U.S. Highway 51 in a municipality through which run Interstate 55, U.S. Highway 51 and the Natchez Trace Parkway, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.42042°N, 90.13473°W; 90.  Any facility located on Mullican Road in a county through which run U.S. Highway 84 and Interstate 59,  with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.73395N, 89.18186W; 91.  Any facility located on land in a county through which run Mississippi Highway 25 and U.S. Highway 82 and more particularly described as follows:  Beginning at a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.80645; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.79972; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.36672, -88.80644; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.36674, -88.79971; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.80645 and the point of the beginning; 92.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: All that part of the South half (S 1/2) of the SE 1/4 of NE 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, lying and being West of State Highway No. 589, containing one (1) acre, more or less. LESS AND EXCEPT: Begin at the point of intersection of the North line of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West with the present Southwesterly right-of-way line of Mississippi Highway No. 589, said point is also the Northeast corner of grantor property; said point is 50.6 feet West of Station 7 + 59.27 on the centerline of survey of Mississippi Highway No. 589 as shown on the plans for State Project No. SP-0014-2(10); from said POINT OF BEGINNING run thence South 08°57' East along said present Southwesterly right-of-way line, a distance of 37.1 feet to a point that is perpendicular to and 50 feet Southwesterly of Station 7 + 30 on the centerline of survey of Mississippi Highway 589 as shown on the plans for said project; run thence South 81°03' West, a distance of 35.7 feet to the West line of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 14 and the West line of grantors property; run thence North along said West property line, a distance of 42.2 feet to the Northwest corner of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 14 and the Northwest corner of grantors property; run thence East along grantors North property line, a distance of 29.5 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING containing 0.03 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi. LESS AND EXCEPT: A part of the South one-half of the Southeast 1/4 of Northeast 1/4, Northerly of a certain fence and West of Mississippi State Highway 589, in Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi and more particularly described as commencing at a pine (lighter) stake being used as the Southwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of Southeast 1/4 of the above said Section 14, thence North and along the West line of the East 1/4 of the above said Section 14 1638.8 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.  Thence continue North and along the West line of the East 1/4 of the above said Section 14, 278.5 feet to the Southerly line of the property Bobby G. Aultman and Marilyn S. Aultman previously sold to the Mississippi State Highway Department; thence North 81°03' East and along the above said Southerly property line for 35.7 feet more or less to the Westerly right-of-way line of Mississippi State Highway 589; thence Southeasterly and along the above said Westerly right-of-way line 232.7 feet to a concrete right-of-way marker; thence South 51°39' West and along the Northerly line of a wooden fence 88 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING. AND ALSO: A parcel of land in a part of the Southeast 1/4 of Northwest 1/4 and a part of the Southwest 1/4, Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, and more particularly described as beginning at a point where the Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98 intersects the West line of the above said Southeast 1/4 of Northwest 1/4; thence North 67°34' East and along the Southerly right-of-way line of said highway 208.75 feet; thence South 208.75 feet; thence South 67°34' West 208.75 feet; thence South 141.3 feet; thence North 89°07'30" West 388.9 feet to the centerline of Parkers Creek; thence Northerly and along the centerline of said creek for the next three (3) calls:  North 35°53' East 115.6 feet; North 25°05' East 68.5 feet; North 09°51'30" West 64.3 feet to the Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98; thence North 67°34' East and along the Southerly right-of-way line of said highway 327.85 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.  The above described area contains 3.02 acres. AND ALSO: Commencing at the Southwest corner of the Southwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, run South 88°05'27" East 310.00 feet, thence South 0°53'16" West 60.50 feet to a point on a fence line, thence run along fence line South 88°05'27" East 718.93 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, thence North 08°48'10" West 714.67 feet to a point on the South right-of-way line of Highway No. 98, thence along said right-of-way along a curve to the right with a delta angle of 02°04'26" having a radius of 5603.58 feet and an arc length of 202.84 feet, with a chord bearing a distance of North 71°53'47" East 202.83 feet to a Concrete Highway right-of-way marker, thence South 20°09'13" East 328.13 feet, thence South 69°00'47" East 117.68 feet, thence South 0°58'19" West 429.12 feet to a Point on Possession Line fence, thence along said fence North 88°05'27" West 299.23 feet back to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 5.0885 acres, more or less and being situated in the SW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and the NW 1/4 of the SE l/4 of said Section 14, together with all improvements and appurtenances thereunto belonging. AND ALSO: PARCEL NUMBER ONE:  That part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, of Lamar County, Mississippi, being located and situated East of the center thread of Mill Creek as the same presently runs through and bisects said 40-acre tract, and comprising 10.9 acres, more or less, and all being part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) of said Section, Township and Range, Lamar County, Mississippi. AND ALSO: PARCEL NUMBER TWO:  A part of the Southeast Quarter of the Northwest Quarter (Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4) and part of the Northeast Quarter of the Southwest (Northeast 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) all in Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, being more particularly described as follows, to wit: Beginning at a point where the South margin of State Highway 98 intersects the West margin of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, and run Easterly along the South margin of said highway right-of-way 208.75 feet; thence South 208.75 feet; thence Westerly parallel with the South margin of said highway right-of-way 208.75 feet to the West forty line; thence North 208.75 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 1 acre, more or less. LESS AND EXCEPT: Begin at the point of intersection of an Easterly line of grantors property with the present Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98 as shown on the plans for State Project No. 97-0014-02-044-10; from said POINT OF BEGINNING run thence South 02°56' West along said Easterly property line, a distance of 127.6 feet; thence run South 69°11' West, a distance of 52.9 feet; thence run South 67°13' West, a distance of 492.7 feet to the Westerly line of grantors property and the center of a creek; thence run Northerly along said Westerly property line and said center of creek, a distance of 122.8 feet to said present Southerly right-of-way line; thence run North 67°13' East along said present Southerly right-of-way line, a distance of 553.4 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 1.43 acres, more or less, and being situated in and a part of the North 1/2 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi. LESS AND EXCEPT: COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SECTION 14, TOWNSHIP 4 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, LAMAR COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI, PROCEED EAST 2136.60 FEET; THENCE NORTH 2508.67 FEET TO AN IRON PIN AND THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PARCEL HEREIN DESCRIBED. FROM THE DESCRIBED POINT OF BEGINNING, PROCEED NORTH 11°19'49" EAST 217.55 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 40°11'01" EAST 118.28 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 22°24'39" WEST 179.15 FEET TO AN IRON PIN ON THE SOUTHERN BOUNDARY OF U.S. HIGHWAY 98; THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERN RIGHT-OF-WAY BOUNDARY OF SAID HIGHWAY AS FOLLOWS: SOUTH 67°35'21" WEST 699.55 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE SOUTH 69°16'57" WEST 67.67 FEET TO A CONCRETE RIGHT-OF-WAY MARKER; THENCE SOUTH 67°35'21" WEST 310.34 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE LEAVING SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY SOUTH 01°25'53" WEST 667.21 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 67°35'21" EAST 491.91 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 22°24'39" WEST 193.77 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 67°35'21" EAST 629.48 FEET BACK TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING. SAID PARCEL CONTAINS 12.39 ACRES AND IS LOCATED PART IN THE SE 1/4 OF THE NW 1/4, PART IN THE NE 1/4 OF THE SW 1/4, AND PART IN THE NW 1/4 OF THE SW 1/4, ALL IN SECTION 14, TOWNSHIP 4 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, LAMAR COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI; 93.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts, swimming pools and related facilities located at 333 Fairway Drive, Pontotoc, Mississippi; 94.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: A 4.16 acre parcel being situated in the SE 1/4 of SE 1/4 of Section 31, T3N-R1E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the SE corner of said Section 31, run thence WEST - 643.33 feet to a point on the mean high water line of the Pearl River; thence North 10 degrees 50 minutes 51 seconds West - 444.38 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 58.90 feet along said mean high water line to the POINT OF BEGINNING:  run thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 326.63 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 19 degrees 52 minutes 24 seconds West - 74.80 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 78 degrees 01 minutes 52 seconds East - 464.81 feet; thence South 07 degrees 25 minutes 10 seconds East - 39.75 feet; thence South 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds East - 361.10 feet; thence South 78 degrees 01 minutes 52 seconds West - 451.31 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING. TOGETHER WITH a 30 foot wide access easement being situated in the SE 1/4 of Section 31, T3N, R1E, Rankin County, Mississippi; being 15 feet either side of a centerline and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the SE corner of said Section, run thence North - 380.22 feet to a point on the northerly right-of-way of Moncure Road; thence North 86 degrees 39 minutes 56 seconds West - 257.25 feet along said road to the POINT OF BEGINNING; run thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 557.86 feet to the POINT OF TERMINUS; 95.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 26 and U.S. Highway 11 intersect and a public community college is located; 96.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 meets U.S. Highway 82; 97.  Any facility and/or venue and related property at 305 South Monroe Street, Houston, Mississippi; 98. A project as defined in Section 75-76-5. The status of these municipalities, districts, clubhouses, facilities, golf courses and areas described in this paragraph (o)(iii) as qualified resort areas does not require any declaration of same by the department. The governing authorities of a municipality or county described, in whole or in part, in item 6, 21, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 46, 48, 51, 53, 54, 55, 56, 58, 59, 61, 63, 64, 66, 67, 68, 73, 74, 83, 84, 93, 94, 95, 96, or 97 of this paragraph (o)(iii) may by ordinance, with respect to the qualified resort area described in the same item:  specify the hours of operation of facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale; specify the percentage of revenue that facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and designate the areas in which facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale may be located. (p)  "Native wine" means any product, produced in Mississippi for sale, having an alcohol content not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by weight and made in accordance with revenue laws of the United States, which shall be obtained primarily from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of ripe grapes, fruits, berries, honey or vegetables grown and produced in Mississippi; provided that bulk, concentrated or fortified wines used for blending may be produced without this state and used in producing native wines.  The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to permit a producer to import such bulk and/or fortified wines into this state for use in blending with native wines without payment of any excise tax that would otherwise accrue thereon. (q)  "Native winery" means any place or establishment within the State of Mississippi where native wine is produced, in whole or in part, for sale. (r)  "Bed and breakfast inn" means an establishment within a municipality where in consideration of payment, breakfast and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located not less than eight (8) and not more than nineteen (19) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities, that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations; however, such restriction on the minimum number of sleeping rooms shall not apply to establishments on the National Register of Historic Places.  No place shall qualify as a bed and breakfast inn under this article unless on the date of the initial application for a license under this article more than fifty percent (50%) of the sleeping rooms are located in a structure formerly used as a residence. (s)  "Board" shall refer to the Board of Tax Appeals of the State of Mississippi. (t)  "Spa facility" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a hotel where, in consideration of payment, patrons receive from licensed professionals a variety of private personal care treatments such as massages, facials, waxes, exfoliation and hairstyling. (u)  "Art studio or gallery" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area that is in the sole business of allowing patrons to view and/or purchase paintings and other creative artwork. (v)  "Cooking school" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a nationally recognized company that offers an established culinary education curriculum and program where, in consideration of payment, patrons are given scheduled professional group instruction on culinary techniques.  For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of cooking school shall not include schools or classes offered by grocery stores, convenience stores or drugstores. (w)  "Campus" means property owned by a public school district, community or junior college, college or university in this state where educational courses are taught, school functions are held, tests and examinations are administered or academic course credits are awarded; however, the term shall not include any "restaurant" or "hotel" that is located on property owned by a community or junior college, college or university in this state, and is operated by a third party who receives all revenue generated from food and alcoholic beverage sales. (x)  "Native spirit" shall mean any beverage, produced in Mississippi for sale, manufactured primarily by the distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar produced in Mississippi, including dilutions and mixtures of these beverages.  In order to be classified as "native spirit" under the provisions of this article, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the finished product by volume shall have been obtained from distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar grown and produced in Mississippi. (y)  "Native distillery" shall mean any place or establishment within this state where native spirit is produced in whole or in part for sale. (z)  "Warehouse operator" shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 67-1-201. (aa)  "Craft spirit" shall mean any alcoholic beverage produced, in whole or in part, in Mississippi by a distillery created under the laws of Mississippi at a location within Mississippi. (bb)  "Craft distillery" shall mean any place or establishment within this state where craft spirit is produced in whole or in part. SECTION 22.  Section 67-1-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-101.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings ascribed in this section, unless the context clearly otherwise requires: (a) "Municipality" means any incorporated city, town or village that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law or is in a county that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law. (b) "Leisure and recreation district" means an area officially designated by ordinance or resolution of the governing authorities of a municipality or county as a leisure and recreation district, and an area designated as a leisure and recreation district under subsection (3) of this section. (c) "County" means any county that has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law. (2)  (a)  Subject to the provisions of this section, the governing authorities of a municipality, by ordinance, may establish one or more leisure and recreation districts within the corporate boundaries of the municipality and designate the geographic area or areas to be included within a district. The governing authorities of a municipality, by ordinance, may modify the boundaries of a leisure and recreation district.  In addition, the boundaries of a leisure and recreation district may extend from within the municipality into the unincorporated area of the county in which the municipality is located if the county consents to the extension and has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law. (b) Subject to the provisions of this section, the board of Supervisors of a county, by resolution, may establish one or more leisure and recreation districts within the county that are outside the corporate limits of any municipality in the county and designate the geographic area or areas to be included within the districts. (c) The designation or modification of the geographic area or areas as a leisure and recreation district shall include a detailed description of the area or areas within the district, boundaries of the district and a georeferenced map of the district.  In addition to any other matters addressed in an ordinance or resolution establishing or modifying a leisure and recreation district, a municipality or county, as the case may be, must describe the manner in which the municipality or county, as the case may be, will provide for adequate law enforcement and other public safety measures and services within the district. Following the establishment and/or modification of a leisure and recreation district, the municipality or county, as the case may be, shall provide the Department of Revenue with (i) a copy of any ordinance or resolution relating to the establishment or modification of the district, (ii) verification from the municipal police department and/or applicable sheriff's department indicating how such department will provide adequate law enforcement and other public safety measures and services within the district, and (iii) a list of persons or other entities that hold permits issued under Section 67-1-51(c), (e), (f), (g), (l), (n) or (o) and are located and/or doing business under such permits in the district at the time the district is established. (3) In addition to any other provision of this section, a project as defined in Section 75-76-5 shall be a leisure and recreation district. SECTION 23.  Subject to the provisions of this section, any  owner or operator of a licensed gaming establishment licensed before January 1, 2026, that makes capital improvements to the licensed gaming establishment in an aggregate amount of at least One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) shall be allowed a credit against the license fees imposed under Sections 75-76-177 and 75-76-195.  The capital improvements must be made on or after July 1, 2026, and not later than July 1, 2029.  The credit shall be for an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of the costs of the capital improvements and may be claimed by the licensee in equal prorated increments over three (3) years beginning with the year in which the credit was earned. SECTION 24.  Sections 6 and 23 of this act shall be codified as new sections in Chapter 76, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 25.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.